es: Forma de la golosina de fruta: Barras; Bocados; Masticables; Chips; Crujientes; Gomitas; Jaleas; Láminas; Rollos; Otro
pl: Forma przekąski owocowej: Batony; Kąski; Cukierki do żucia; Chipsy; Chrupki; Żelki; Galaretki; Listki owocowe; Roladki; Inna
it: Formato dello snack di frutta: Barrette; Bocconcini; Masticabili; Chips; Croccanti; Gommose; Gelatine; Sfoglia essiccata; Rotelle; Altro
fr: Sous forme de friandise aux fruits: Barres; Bouchées; À mâcher; Chips; Croustillants; Gélifiés; Gelées; Cuir de fruits; Rouleaux; Autre
sv: Form på fruktsnacks: Bars; Bitar; Tuggbitar; Chips; Crisps; Gelébitar; Geléer; Fruktremmar; Rullar; Övrigt
hr-HR: Oblik voćnog snacka: Pločice; Zalogaji; Žvakaći bomboni; Čips; Hrskavi listići; Gumeni bomboni; Žele bomboni; Voćna koža; Rolice; Ostalo
zh-CN: 水果味零食形态: 棒状; 块状; 软糖; 脆片; 果脆; 果汁软糖; 果冻; 果丹皮; 卷状; 其他
da: Frugtsnackform: Barer; Hapsere; Chews; Chips; Crisps; Vingummier; Geléer; Frugtlæder; Ruller; Andet
bg-BG: Форма на плодовата закуска: Барчета; Хапки; Дъвчащи; Чипс; Хрупкави; Желирани; Желета; Пестил; Ролки; Друго
tr: Meyve atıştırmalığı formu: Bar; Atıştırmalık lokma; Çiğnenebilir; Cips; Kıtır; Yumuşak şeker; Jel; Pestil; Rulo; Diğer
pt-BR: Formato de lanche de frutas: Barras; Pedaços; Mastigáveis; Chips; Crocantes; Gomas; Geleias; Couro de fruta; Rolinhos; Outro
zh-TW: 水果零食形式: 能量棒/棒狀; 一口吃; 軟糖/嚼錠; 脆片; 脆餅/脆片; 軟糖; 果凍; 果丹皮; 捲狀; 其他
el: Μορφή σνακ φρούτων: Μπάρες; Μπουκιές; Μαστιχωτά; Τσιπς; Τραγανά; Ζελεδάκια; Ζελέ; Πολτός φρούτων σε φύλλα; Ρολά; Άλλο
lt-LT: Vaisių užkandžio forma: Batonėliai; Kąsneliai; Kramtomieji saldainiai; Traškučiai; Trapučiai; Guminukai; Želė saldainiai; Vaisių juostelės; Vyniotiniai; Kita
ro-RO: Forma gustării din fructe: Batoane; Bucățele; Bomboane masticabile; Chipsuri; Felii crocante; Jeleuri gumate; Jeleuri; Foaie din fructe deshidratate; Rulouri; Altele
en: Fruit snack form: Bars; Bites; Chews; Chips; Crisps; Gummies; Jellies; Leather; Rolls; Other
nb: Format for fruktsnacks: Barer; Biter; Myke biter; Chips; Crisps; Vingummi; Gelé; Fruktlær; Ruller; Annet
vi: Dạng kẹo dẻo trái cây: Dạng thanh; Viên nhỏ; Dạng kẹo nhai; Sấy giòn; Bánh giòn; Kẹo dẻo; Thạch; Mứt trái cây cuộn; Cuộn; Khác
ja: フルーツグミフォーム: バー; バイト; チュー; チップス; クリスプ; グミ; ゼリー; フルーツレザー; ロール; その他
hu: Gyümölcsös snack formája: Szelet; Falatkák; Rágható csemege; Csipsz; Tallér; Gumicukor; Zselé; Gyümölcsbőr; Tekercs; Egyéb
nl: Fruitsnackstijl: Repen; Hapjes; Kauwsnoepjes; Chips; Krokantjes; Gummy's; Geleisnoepjes; Vruchtenleer; Rolletjes; Anders
sl-SI: Oblika sadnega prigrizka: Ploščice; Grižljaji; Žvečljivi bonboni; Čips; Hrustljavčki; Gumijevi bonboni; Želeji; Sadno usnje; Zvitki; Drugo
sk-SK: Forma ovocného občerstvenia: Tyčinky; Kúsky; Žuvacie cukríky; Čipsy; Chrumky; Gumené cukríky; Želé; Ovocná koža; Rolky; Iné
ko: 과일 스낵 형태: 바; 바이트; 츄; 칩; 크리스프; 구미; 젤리; 레더; 롤; 기타
fi: Hedelmävälipalan muoto: Patukat; Palat; Purupalat; Sipsit; Lastut; Kumimakeiset; Hyytelöt; Hedelmänahka; Rullat; Muu
cs: Ovocná svačinka: Tyčinky; Kousky; Žvýkací bonbony; Chipsy; Křupky; Gumové bonbony; Želé; Ovocná kůže; Rolky; Ostatní
pt-PT: Formato de snack de fruta: Barras; Pedaços; Mastigáveis; Chips; Crocantes; Gomas; Geleias; Tiras de fruta; Rolos; Outro
th: รูปแบบของขนมผลไม้: แบบแท่ง; ชิ้นพอดีคำ; แบบเคี้ยว; แผ่นกรอบ; อบกรอบ; กัมมี่; เยลลี่; ผลไม้กวนแผ่น; แบบม้วน; อื่นๆ
de: Fruchtsnack-Form: Riegel; Bites; Kausnacks; Chips; Crisps; Fruchtgummis; Gelees; Fruchtleder; Rollen; Sonstige
ru: Форма фруктового снека: Батончики; Кусочки; Жевательные конфеты; Чипсы; Слайсы; Мармелад; Желе; Пастила; Рулетики; Другое